public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.aff
SFX A énter enterison/J ^asénter
SFX A énter enterié/N ^asénter
SFX A énter enteriéu/O ^asénter
SFX A énter enteron/J ^asénter
SFX A énter enterà/HLP ^asénter
SFX A énter enteràe/P ^asénter
SFX A énter enterè/H ^asénter
SFX A énter enterèmi/I ^asénter
SFX A énter enteré/N ^asénter
SFX A énter enterémoni/K ^asénter
SFX A énter enterésimo/J ^asénter
SFX A énter enterésimoni/K ^asénter
SFX A énter enteréu/O ^asénter
SFX A énter enterí/N ^asénter
SFX A énter entería/HLP ^asénter
SFX A énter enteríami/I ^asénter
SFX A énter enteríatu/M ^asénter
SFX A énter enteríe/HP ^asénter
SFX A énter enteríelo/Q ^asénter
SFX A énter enteríemi/I ^asénter
SFX A énter enterímoni/K ^asénter
SFX A énter enteríu/O ^asénter
SFX A énter enterò/H ^asénter
SFX A énter enteròmi/I ^asénter
SFX A énter entese/G ^asénter
SFX A énter entesta/G ^asénter
SFX A énter enteste/G ^asénter
SFX A énter entesti/G ^asénter
SFX A énter entesto/G ^asénter
SFX A énter enteva/HNP ^asénter
SFX A énter entevau/O ^asénter
SFX A énter enteve/H ^asénter
SFX A énter entevi/LN ^asénter
SFX A énter entevo/H ^asénter
SFX A énter enti/EFL ^asénter
SFX A énter entimo/J ^asénter
SFX A énter ention/J ^asénter
SFX A énter entisen/J ^asénter
SFX A énter entision/J ^asénter
SFX A énter entison/J ^asénter
SFX A énter entiven/J ^asénter
SFX A énter entivion/J ^asénter
SFX A énter entivié/N ^asénter
SFX A énter entiviéu/O ^asénter
SFX A énter entivon/J ^asénter
SFX A énter entié/N ^asénter
SFX A énter entiéu/O ^asénter
SFX A énter ento/H ^asénter
SFX A énter enton/J ^asénter
SFX A énter entuda/G ^asénter
SFX A énter entude/G ^asénter
SFX A énter entudi/G ^asénter
SFX A énter entudo/G ^asénter
SFX A énter enté/FN ^asénter
SFX A énter entéa/HNP ^asénter
SFX A énter entéami/I ^asénter
SFX A énter entéau/O ^asénter
SFX A énter entée/H ^asénter
SFX A énter entéelo/Q ^asénter
SFX A énter entéemi/I ^asénter
SFX A énter entéi/LN ^asénter
SFX A énter entéimo/J ^asénter
SFX A énter entéimoni/K ^asénter
SFX A énter entéitu/M ^asénter
SFX A énter entémoni/K ^asénter
SFX A énter entéo/H ^asénter
SFX A énter entéomi/I ^asénter
SFX A énter entéu/O ^asénter
SFX A énter entévami/I ^asénter
SFX A énter entévelo/Q ^asénter
SFX A énter entévemi/I ^asénter
SFX A énter entévimo/J ^asénter
SFX A énter entévimoni/K ^asénter
SFX A énter entévitu/M ^asénter
SFX A énter entévomi/I ^asénter
SFX A énter entí/FN ^asénter
SFX A énter entímoni/K ^asénter
SFX A énter entíu/O ^asénter
SFX A énxer ento/G [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaralo/Q [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarami/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaratu/M [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarave/PR [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaremo/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaren/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaresi/N [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaresiu/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarimo/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarion/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarisen/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarision/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarisié/N [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarisiéu/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarison/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarié/N [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxariéu/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaron/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarà/HLP [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaràe/P [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarè/H [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarèmi/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaré/N [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarémoni/K [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarésimo/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarésimoni/K [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaréu/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarí/N [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaría/HLP [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaríami/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaríatu/M [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaríe/HP [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaríelo/Q [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaríemi/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarímoni/K [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaríu/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxarò/H [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxaròmi/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxe/GHP [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxemo/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxen/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxendo/EF [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeralo/Q [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerami/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeratu/M [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerave/PR [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeremo/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeren/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeresi/N [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeresiu/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerimo/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerion/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerisen/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerision/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerisié/N [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerisiéu/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerison/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerié/N [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeriéu/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeron/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerà/HLP [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeràe/P [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerè/H [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerèmi/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeré/N [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerémoni/K [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerésimo/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerésimoni/K [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeréu/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerí/N [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxería/HLP [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeríami/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeríatu/M [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeríe/HP [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeríelo/Q [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeríemi/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerímoni/K [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeríu/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxerò/H [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeròmi/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxese/G [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxesta/G [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeste/G [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxesti/G [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxesto/G [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeva/HNP [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxevau/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxeve/H [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxevi/LN [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxevo/H [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxi/EFL [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enximo/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxion/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxisen/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxision/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxison/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxiven/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxivion/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxivié/N [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxiviéu/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxivon/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxié/N [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxiéu/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxo/H [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxon/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxuda/G [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxude/G [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxudi/G [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxudo/G [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxé/FN [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxéa/HNP [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxéami/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxéau/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxée/H [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxéelo/Q [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxéemi/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxéi/LN [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxéimo/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxéimoni/K [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxéitu/M [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxémoni/K [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxéo/H [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxéomi/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxéu/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxévami/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxévelo/Q [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxévemi/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxévimo/J [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxévimoni/K [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxévitu/M [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxévomi/I [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxí/FN [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxímoni/K [fpt]énxer
SFX A énxer enxíu/O [fpt]énxer
SFX A énđer ento/G [lptŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer ento/G ^xgrénđer
SFX A énđer enđaralo/Q [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarami/I [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđaratu/M [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarave/PR [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđaremo/J [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđaren/J [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđaresi/N [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđaresiu/O [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarimo/J [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarion/J [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarisen/J [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarision/J [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarisié/N [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarisiéu/O [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarison/J [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarié/N [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđariéu/O [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđaron/J [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarà/HLP [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđaràe/P [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarè/H [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarèmi/I [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđaré/N [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarémoni/K [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarésimo/J [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđarésimoni/K [lprtŧ]énđer
SFX A énđer enđaréu/O [lprtŧ]énđer
