public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.dic
aerar/A
dexalvear/A
ansimar/A
arsirar/A
aumentar/A
badajar/A
dexbalar/A
xbalordir/A
kontrabandonar/A
inbaretar/A
strabastar/A
baukar/A
baxukiar/A
inberlar/A
xbevaciar/A
inbilar/A
biondiđar/A
xbixegar/A
rebokar/A
xbolsegar/A
bondar/A
xbosegar/A
inboŧar/A
bragetar/A
braŧolar/A
xbrigar/A
broɉar/A
xbrufar/A
xbuelar/A
inbusolotar/A
recamar/A
cefar/A
soscèñer/A
cicolar/A
cokolatar/A
redar/A
xdentar/A
dexertar/A
indíxer/A
domar/A
redopiar/A
adotar/A
kondúxer/A
đavariar/A
đornaliđar/A
reelèđer/A
riéser/A
exaurir/A
rarefar/A
fakinar/A
desfamar/A
infatir/A
favoriđar/A
sakrifegar/A
sfénder/A
inferetar/A
fetonar/A
fiaskar/A
refifar/A
finar/A
sfioređar/A
afitar/A
desfodrar/A
folgorar/A
inforkar/A
desfornar/A
fradeliđar/A
infrapolir/A
fraturar/A
frèmer/A
infrixar/A
frustar/A
infumegar/A
futiñar/A
dexgajar/A
galopar/A
dexganŧar/A
garbiđar/A
dexgatejar/A
xginŧar/A
xgomentar/A
governar/A
gradelar/A
dexgranelar/A
ingrasar/A
agredir/A
gretolar/A
xgriñolir/A
grongolar/A
guar/A
guarir/A
xguilŧar/A
exibir/A
indulxentar/A
iniŧiar/A
inrikir/A
subintrar/A
tranxitar/A
jutar/A
inɉermar/A
xɉoŧolar/A
skàder/A
inkaɉar/A
rekalkar/A
kalŧar/A
akanar/A
inkandir/A
kanopar/A
skantonar/A
deskapitar/A
skapuŧar/A
skarkajar/A
inkaroñar/A
inkartelar/A
inkaspar/A
skatarar/A
kaŧar/A
skavar/A
kaxermar/A
koatar/A
deskojonar/A
kolar/A
skolorir/A
komisionar/A
skonbàter/A
skonkuasar/A
konotar/A
kontinuar/A
rekonŧar/A
deskórer/A
deskordar/A
inkorlar/A
skortegar/A
inkotolar/A
skovolar/A
rinkréser/A
kriolar/A
skrostar/A
inkuadrar/A
kubiar/A
kuestionar/A
deskular/A
kupar/A
kustionar/A
dexlanegar/A
xlanŧar/A
stralasar/A
xlavakiar/A
lekar/A
leskar/A
xlexerir/A
dexligar/A
lindar/A
litigar/A
xlojar/A
aloŧar/A
xludrar/A
lustrar/A
maestrar/A
xmagonar/A
xmaliŧiar/A
inmanegar/A
amankar/A
mañetiđar/A
marcar/A
marɉiar/A
mascar/A
inmaskerar/A
matonar/A
maxarir/A
destrameđar/A
xmemorar/A
menestrar/A
xmeravejar/A
mestierar/A
perméter/A
parametriđar/A
minconar/A
xmisiar/A
moɉar/A
xmolacar/A
remondar/A
xmontar/A
morbidir/A
xmorfir/A
inmortalar/A
moŧar/A
inmucar/A
inmufir/A
remurkiar/A
mutir/A
inmuxonir/A
anaspar/A
denegar/A
xnetar/A
nobilir/A
denonŧiar/A
dexnoxelar/A
iñarar/A
ñokolar/A
ofrir/A
omologar/A
ondiđar/A
orir/A
subordenar/A
ormeđar/A
oskurar/A
spacarar/A
padroneđar/A
despaɉar/A
paletar/A
palixar/A
inpaludar/A
konpaniđar/A
papolar/A
reaparir/A
paređar/A
repartir/A
inpasir/A
spasiđar/A
inpastrocar/A
repatriar/A
inspaŧientar/A
paxentar/A
despegolar/A
spelacar/A
inpenir/A
depénđer/A
despenolar/A
despeocar/A
straperdonar/A
perorar/A
pestegar/A
petegolar/A
spetorar/A
piadeđar/A
strapiantar/A
konpiàxer/A
pikar/A
inpinir/A
inpionbar/A
despirar/A
pitokar/A
spiŧegar/A
suplegar/A
inpolmonar/A
poltroniđar/A
antepóner/A
opóner/A
inponarar/A
strapontar/A
spontiñar/A
soporar/A
straportar/A
konpostar/A
spotacar/A
precixar/A
konprénder/A
apreŧiar/A
inprimar/A
profetiđar/A
inprovar/A
puñar/A
inputar/A
puxar/A
radobar/A
xraixar/A
ranfar/A
ranpiñar/A
rasir/A
raxonar/A
rekuiđir/A
relaŧionar/A
restelar/A
rexistrar/A
riñar/A
rivar/A
inrodolar/A
derokir/A
romañir/A
ronkolar/A
inrosir/A
rovinar/A
rugar/A
ruñir/A
sabionar/A
desagrar/A
sakramentar/A
saldar/A
saltelar/A
desanguar/A
sarkiar/A
savarɉar/A
scanxar/A
sediar/A
sekir/A
insèguer/A
deseleđar/A
konsentir/A
serbar/A
sfraxenar/A
simar/A
sitar/A
skarar/A
inskeletrar/A
skoar/A
iskríver/A
soɉar/A
somar/A
sorbir/A
sparañar/A
prosperar/A
spigar/A
spojar/A
spudar/A
kontrastaɉar/A
instaurar/A
stiletar/A
destokar/A
stranbar/A
stringar/A
destrúxer/A
suar/A
susultar/A
susurar/A
intaɉar/A
tanbarar/A
retardar/A
tastiđar/A
tèmer/A
tenpestar/A
stentar/A
atèñer/A
intratéñer/A
esterminar/A
tibiar/A
toir/A
tonbar/A
torcar/A
torxiar/A
trabaskar/A
tranguɉar/A
rintraŧar/A
tresar/A
intrigar/A
trotar/A
ŧakar/A
ŧéder/A
inŧeñar/A
eŧetuar/A
ŧinkuantar/A
inŧivilir/A
ujar/A
reuxar/A
xvalixar/A
vareŧar/A
ravéder/A
xvelixar/A
xventoxar/A
soraveñir/A
vèrđer/A
inverniđar/A
vesigar/A
viađar/A
viñar/A
avixar/A
invokar/A
deskonvòlxer/A
xaolar/A
xbrisar/A
dexerir/A
xɉànxer/A
inxoɉelar/A
